Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.230

Purpose.

The purpose of RCW 43.10.232 is to grant authority to the attorney general concurrent with the county prosecuting attorneys to investigate and prosecute crimes. The purpose of *RCW 43.10.234 is to insure access by the attorney general to the procedural powers of the various prosecuting attorneys in exercising criminal prosecutorial authority granted in RCW 43.10.232 or otherwise granted by the legislature.

[ 1981 c 335 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to RCW 43.10.234 appears to be erroneous. RCW 10.01.190 was apparently intended.